Washington statutes.
RCW 19.186.060

Liability for failure to comply with chapter.

A roofing or siding contractor or salesperson who fails to comply with the requirements of this chapter shall be liable to the homeowner for any actual damages sustained by the person as a result of the failure. Nothing in this section shall limit any cause of action or remedy available under RCW 19.186.050 or chapter 19.86 RCW.

[ 1994 c 285 s 7.]